Utah statutes.
49-20-409.   Long-term disability -- Cost of health coverage benefit.

(1)  Under the direction of the board, the program shall provide for health insurance coverage for state employees who receive a monthly disability benefit under Title 49, Chapter 21, Public Employees' Long-Term Disability Act.

(2)  A risk pool, other than the state risk pool, may elect to provide a benefit for its employees similar to the benefit provided under Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 130, 2007 General Session

